Massachusetts, session 194th, H286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section
116I the following section:-
Section 116I½. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Autism spectrum”, any of the pervasive developmental disorders as defined by the most
recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, including autistic
disorder, Asperger's disorder and pervasive developmental disorders not otherwise specified.
of 7

“Correction officer”, any officer employed by a correctional facility who is tasked with
the custody, care, or transport of incarcerated or detained persons.
“Correctional facility”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 125.
“Law enforcement agency”, (i) a state, county, municipal or district law enforcement
agency, including, but not limited to: a city, town or district police department, the office of
environmental law enforcement, the University of Massachusetts police department, the
department of the state police, the Massachusetts Port Authority police department, also known
as the Port of Boston Authority police department, and the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority police department; (ii) a sheriff’s department in its performance of police duties and
functions; or (iii) a public or private college, university or other educational institution or
hospital police department.
“Law enforcement officer” or “officer”, any officer of a law enforcement agency,
including the head of the law enforcement agency; a special state police officer appointed
pursuant to section 58 or section 63 of chapter 22C; a special sheriff appointed pursuant to
section 4 of chapter 37 performing police duties and functions; a deputy sheriff appointed
pursuant to section 3 of said chapter 37 performing police duties and functions; a constable
executing an arrest for any reason; or any other special, reserve or intermittent police officer.
(b) The municipal police training committee shall establish an in-service training
curriculum on or before January 1, 2022 for the training of law enforcement officers and
correction officers in appropriate interactions with persons on the autism spectrum; provided,
that this training shall not increase the currently required hours of in-service training. The
municipal police training committee shall develop guidelines for law enforcement response to
of 7

persons on the autism spectrum who are victims or witnesses to crime, or suspected or convicted
of a crime or who are in the custody of a law enforcement agency or officer. The course of
instruction and the guidelines shall emphasize: (1) positive responses to persons on the autism
spectrum; (2) de-escalating potentially dangerous situations; (3) understanding of the different
manner by which persons on the autism spectrum process sensory stimuli and language; and (4)
appropriate methods of interrogation. The training shall address the best practices for interactions
with the broad range of persons on the autism spectrum, including those with intersecting
marginalized identities.
SECTION 2. Section 38G½ of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
The board shall provide an endorsement in autism which shall include no less than 2
years of coursework and field experience for licensed special education teachers to acquire the
competencies necessary to conduct assessments, develop appropriate individualized education
programs, supervise paraprofessionals and teacher assistants in classrooms with students with
autism, provide specially designed instruction and related services and consult and collaborate
with other educators, including general education teachers, in order to meet the unique and
complex educational needs of students with autism in the least restrictive environment. The
board shall provide an endorsement in autism for paraprofessionals and teacher assistants, which
shall include no less than 2 years of coursework and field experience to acquire the competencies
necessary in order to meet the unique and complicated educational needs of students with autism
in the least restrictive environment; provided, however, that to be eligible for an endorsement in
autism, the paraprofessional or teacher assistant shall hold an associate’s degree or bachelor’s
of 7

degree in arts or sciences from an accredited community college, college or university with a
major course in the arts or sciences appropriate to the instruction of students with autism.
Competencies shall also include, but not be limited to, the impact of autism on verbal and
nonverbal communication, social interaction, sensory experiences, behaviors, literacy and
academic achievement. All content taught as part of this specialization shall be consistent with
the requirements of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., for
evidence based practices. The requirements for the endorsement in autism, as promulgated by the
board, may also be used to satisfy course requirements necessary to obtain a professional license.
The board shall promulgate regulations specifying the subject matter knowledge, skills and
competencies required for such endorsement, including requirements to incorporate renewal of
the endorsement as part of the individual professional development plan required pursuant to
section 38G. Said regulations shall also specify components necessary for preparation programs
offering an endorsement in autism, which shall be included in the department's process for
approving preparation programs.
SECTION 3. Section 3 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “development”, in line 145, the following sentence:-
Whenever an evaluation indicates that a child has a disability on the autism spectrum, the child’s
Individualized Education Program shall be periodically reviewed by an independent review
panel comprised of 3 educators appointed by the administrator of special education with an
endorsement in autism pursuant to section 38G½ of chapter 71.
SECTION 4. Said section 3 of said chapter 71B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
of 7

Whenever an evaluation indicates that a child has a disability on the autism spectrum,
which includes autistic disorder, Asperger’s disorder, pervasive developmental disorder not
otherwise specified, childhood disintegrative disorder, or Rhett’s Syndrome, as defined in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the American Psychiatric
Association, the child shall be placed in a special education program specific to children on the
autism spectrum; provided, however, that the special education program is the least restrictive
environment for that child. All teachers, paraprofessionals and teacher assistants assigned to
classrooms where children who have a disability on the autism spectrum are taught shall have an
endorsement in autism pursuant to section 38G½ of chapter 71.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, video cameras shall be
installed in all classrooms and quiet rooms where children who have a disability on the autism
spectrum are taught. The school administrator shall maintain all recordings generated by the
video camera as education records pursuant to 20 USC §1232G(a)(4)(A).
SECTION 5. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish without charge, upon application, to owners of private
passenger motor vehicles and motorcycles who have been diagnosed with a health condition or
disability, such as autism spectrum disorder, as defined in section 116I½ of chapter 6, that may
impede effective communication with a law enforcement officer and upon presentation of
evidence deemed satisfactory by the registrar, distinctive registration plates bearing a blue puzzle
piece or the words, “COMMUNICATION IMPEDIMENT”.
of 7

SECTION 6. Section 8 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding
the following paragraph:-
Each applicant for a license or renewal thereof shall be asked in writing whether they
wish to voluntarily indicate on their license that the applicant has a health condition or disability,
100 such as autism spectrum disorder as defined in section 116I½ of chapter 6, that may impede
101 effective communication with a law enforcement officer. Any request for a communication
102 impediment indicator shall be accompanied by a form prescribed by the registrar and completed
103 by a licensed physician.
104 SECTION 7. Section 8B of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
105 adding the following paragraph:-
106 Each applicant or family member shall be asked in writing whether they wish to
107 voluntarily indicate on their learner’s permit that the applicant has a health condition or
108 disability, such as autism spectrum disorder as defined in section 116I½ of chapter 6, that may
109 impede effective communication with a law enforcement officer. Any request for a
110 communication impediment indicator shall be accompanied by a form prescribed by the registrar
111 and completed by a licensed physician.
112 SECTION 8. Section 8E of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
113 adding the following paragraph:-
114 Each applicant or family member for an identification card or renewal thereof shall be
115 asked in writing whether they wish to voluntarily indicate on their identification card that the
116 applicant has a health condition or disability, such as autism spectrum disorder as defined in
117 section 116I½ of chapter 6, that may impede effective communication with a law enforcement
of 7

118 officer. Any request for a communication impediment indicator shall be accompanied by a form
119 prescribed by the registrar and completed by a licensed physician.
of 7